Hawaii statutes.
§444-16.5 Bond. The contractors
license board may require each licensee, applicant, individual or corporate,
who is a specialty contractor to put up bond in the sum of not less than $5,000
executed by the licensee or applicant as principal and by a surety company
authorized to do business in the State as surety.

The board may require each licensee, applicant,
individual or corporate, who is a general contractor to put up a bond in the
sum of not less than $5,000 executed by the licensee or applicant as principal
and by a surety company authorized to do business in the State as surety.

The board, in exercising its discretion, shall
take into consideration the licensee's or applicant's financial condition and
experience in the field.

The bond shall be in a form as the board may
prescribe, conditioned upon the payment of wages, as defined in section 104-1,
to the employees of the contractor or any other person or entity entitled to
wages when due, and giving employees or any other person or entity entitled to
wages who have not been paid a right of action on the bond in their own names;
and upon the honest conduct of the business of the licensee, and upon the right
of any person injured or damaged by any wrongful act of the licensee to bring
an action on the bond; provided that any claim for wages shall have priority
over all other claims. [L 1969, c 234, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 319, §2;
ree L 1988, c 141, §50; am L 2015, c 165, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next